src/fst/morphology/stems/determiners.lexc
!*************************************************
!! # DETERMINERS
!
!! E. Uí Dhonnchadha
! 
!*************************************************

LEXICON Determiners

!! Determiners: Possessives

! mo/do etc have no independent existance, therefore they are possessive determiners not possessive pronouns.
mo+Det+Poss+1P+Sg:mo		#;	! my
do+Det+Poss+2P+Sg:do		#;	! your
ár+Det+Poss+1P+Pl:ár			#;	! our
bhur+Det+Poss+2P+Pl:bhur	#;	! your 


!mo+Det+Poss+1P+Sg+NG:m'		#;	! my
mo+Det+Poss+1P+Sg+Short:m'		#;	! my  - changed +NG to +Short (as per Trond) for m' before a vowel
mo+Det+Poss+1P+Sg+Short:m’		#;	! my with curly apos ’
!do+Det+Poss+2P+Sg+NG:d'		#;	! your
do+Det+Poss+2P+Sg+Short:d'		#;	! your - changed +NG to +Short (as per Trond for m' for d' before a vowel
do+Det+Poss+2P+Sg+Short:d’		#;	! your with curly apos ’
do+Det+Poss+2P+Sg+NG:t'		#;	! your Bardic Apr 2019
do+Det+Poss+2P+Sg+NG:th'		#;	! your Bardic Apr 2019

! this information is on the noun as initial mutation
! use corresponding +Len / +Ecl to determine whether sing/pl, masc/fem
a+Det+Poss+3P:a			#;	! her/his/their
! a+Det+Poss+3P+Pl:a		#;	! their
! a+Det+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:a		#;	! her
! a+Det+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:a		#;	! his

! SEE PRON-LEX á+Det+Poss+3P:á		#;	! it: bhí sé á dhíol  (being sold?)
!á+Det+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:á		#;	! it: bhí sé á dhíol aici (she was selling it)
!á+Det+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:á		#;	! it: bhí sé á dhíol aige (he was selling it)
!á+Det+Poss+3P+Pl:á			#;	! it: bhí sé á dhíol acu  (they were selling it)


!! Determiners: INTERROGATIVES

! SEE PRON-LEX cad_chuige+Det+Q:tuige				#;	! what
! SEE PRON-LEX cad+Det+Q:cad				#;	! what
! SEE PRON-LEX céard+Det+Q:céard			#;	! what
! SEE PRON-LEX cé+Det+Q:cé				#;	! who
cé+Det+Q+Art+Sg:cén	#;	! which: Det not Pron as requires a noun comp.
! SEE ADV cá+Det+Q:cá					#;	! where
!cathain+Det+Q:cathain		#;	! when

!! Determiners: QUANTIFIERS!!!! (definite & indefinite amounts)

aon+Det+Qty+Idf:aon		#;	! any
aon+Det+Qty+Idf+hPref:haon	#;	! any
aon+Det+Qty:t-aon		#;	! (the) only
cibé+Det+Qty+Idf:cibé		#;	! whatever
leath+Det+Qty:leath		#;	! half
cupla+Det+Qty:cupla		#;	! few/pair
cúpla+Det+Qty:cúpla		#;	! few/pair
! shouldnt mod pron. It intensifies amháin perhaps
!ach+Det+Qty:ach			#;	! only "ach sinne amháin"

gach+Det+Qty+Def:gach		#;	! every
gach+Det+Qty+Def+Ecl:ngach	#;	! every
!gach_uile+Det+Qty+Def:chuile	#;	! every & all (=gach uile)
gach+Det+Qty+Def:chuile	#;	! every & all (=gach uile)
!gach_aon+Det+Qty+Def:chaon	#;	! every one   (=gach aon)
gach+Det+Qty+Def:chaon	#;	! every one   (=gach aon)
!gach_aon+CU+Det+Qty+Def:achan	#;	! every one   (=gach aon)
gach+CU+Det+Qty+Def:achan	#;	! every one   (=gach aon)
uile+Det+Qty+Idf:uile		#;	! all
uile+Det+Qty:uilig		#;	! all together (=uile go léir)
iomaí+Det+Qty+Def:iomaí		#;	! many

!! Determiners: DEMONSTRATIVES !!!!

! the following always come at the end of the noun/pron/adj and cannot 
! be intermingled with other adjectives 
seo+Det+Dem:seo			#;	! this
seo+CM+Det+Dem+NG:so		#;	! this 8-Feb-2023 added NG
sin+Det+Dem:sin			#;	! that
sin+CM+Det+Dem+NG:san		#;	! that
!seo+Det+Dem+NG:s'			#;	! seo (or sin?) e.g. teach s'againne 
seo+Det+Dem+Short:s'			#;	! seo (or sin?) e.g. teach s'againne - shanged to +Short as for m' and d'
seo+Det+Dem+Short:s’			#;	! seo (or sin?) with curly apos ’
siúd+Det+Dem:siúd		#;	! those
úd+Det+Dem:úd			#;	! (those?) yonder
! contextual tagged as demonstrative for now at least ...
eile+Det+Dem:eile		#;	! other
